Alabama, session 2026rs, HB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
12 Section 1. Section 11-50-313, Code of Alabama 1975, is
13 amended to read as follows:
14 "§11-50-313
15 (a)(1) Each corporation that is formed or the that has
16 amended its certificate of incorporation of which is amended
17 under pursuant to this article shall have a board of directors
18 which that shall constitute be the governing body of the
19 corporation, which board shall . Except as otherwise provided
20 by law, the board shall consist of at least three members.
21 (2) The governing body of any municipality that has
22 authorized the creation of a corporation as provided in this
23 article may increase the membership of the board of directors
24 from three to five members. In the event the governing body
25 elects to increase the membership of the board of directors
26 from three to five members, one member added to the board
27 shall be appointed for an initial term of four years and the
28 remaining newly added member for an initial term of six years,
Page 1

remaining newly added member for an initial term of six years,
HB141 Enrolled
29 and thereafter the term of each additional director shall be
30 six years.
31 (3) In any Class 4 municipality which that has adopted
32 a mayor-council form of government pursuant to Chapter 43B
33 (commencing with Section 11-43B-1) of this title, any
34 corporation formed pursuant to this chapter may have a
35 governing body which shall consist that consists of seven
36 members.
37 (4) Any corporation, located in any Class 5
38 municipality, which that is governed by a local law enacted in
39 the 1995 Regular Session may have a governing body which shall
40 consist that consists of seven members.
41 (5) The governing body of any municipality that has a
42 population of less than 5,000 according to the most recent
43 federal decennial census and that has authorized the creation
44 of a corporation as provided in this article may increase the
45 membership of the board of directors from five to seven
46 members. In the event the governing body elects to increase
47 the membership of the board of directors from five to seven
48 members, one member added to the board shall be appointed for
49 an initial term of four years and the remaining newly added
50 member for an initial term of six years, and thereafter the
51 term of each additional director shall be six years.
52 (b)(1) The directors of a corporation shall be elected
53 by the governing body of the municipality in regard to which
54 the corporation was formed, and they shall be elected to hold
55 office for staggered terms. The first term of office of one
56 director shall be two years, of another director shall be four
Page 2

director shall be two years, of another director shall be four
HB141 Enrolled
57 years, and of a third director shall be six years, as shall be
58 designated at the time of their election, and thereafter the
59 term of office of each director shall be six years.
60 (2) In any municipality: (i) with a population of less
61 than 5,000 according to the most recent federal decennial
62 census; (ii) that has authorized the creation of a corporation
63 as provided in this article; and (iii) for which the term of
64 the mayor and members of the municipal governing body were
65 extended by an act of the Legislature; the term of any board
66 member which will expire before the mayor's and members' of
67 the municipal governing body extended terms expire shall be
68 extended by one year.
69 (b)(c) No A fee shall may not be paid to any a director
70 for services rendered with respect to a sanitary sewer system.
71 (d)(1) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection,
72 In in any instance where the system or systems owned and
73 operated by the a corporation are any one or more of a water
74 system, a gas system, and an electric system, the chair of the
75 board of directors may, at the discretion of the governing
76 body of the municipality with respect to which the corporation
77 was primarily organized, may be paid a director's fee in an
78 amount to be set and established by the governing body in an
79 amount not exceeding six hundred dollars ($600) per meeting
80 attended, not to exceed seven thousand two hundred dollars
81 ($7,200) per year, for one system and ten dollars ($10) each
82 meeting for each additional system. Each member of the board
83 of directors, director other than the chair, may be paid a
84 director's fee in an amount to be set and established by the
Page 3

director's fee in an amount to be set and established by the
HB141 Enrolled
85 governing body in an amount not exceeding four hundred dollars
86 ($400) per meeting attended, not to exceed four thousand eight
87 hundred dollars ($4,800) per year for the system.
88 Notwithstanding the foregoing, where
89 (2) the municipality with respect to which the
90 corporation was primarily organized has In all municipalities
91 with a population of less than 5,000 inhabitants according to
92 the most recent official federal decennial census, the maximum
93 total amount of director's fees which that may be paid to the
94 chair of its the board of directors shall may not exceed six
95 hundred dollars ($600) one thousand two hundred dollars
96 ($1,200) per meeting attended, not to exceed seven thousand
97 two hundred dollars ($7,200) per year, and the. The maximum
98 total amount of director's fees which that may be paid to any
99 other member of the board of directors shall may not exceed
100 four hundred dollars ($400) six hundred dollars ($600) per
101 meeting attended, not to exceed four thousand eight hundred
102 dollars ($4,800) seven thousand two hundred dollars ($7,200)
103 per year.
104 (3) In all cities having populations municipalities
105 with a population of not less than 6,500 nor more than 8,500
106 according to the most recent federal decennial census, the
107 members of the board of directors, including the chair, may
108 each be paid a director's fee. The chair of the board shall be
109 compensated in an amount not to exceed exceeding six hundred
110 dollars ($600) per meeting attended, not to exceed seven
111 thousand two hundred dollars ($7,200) per year. Each director,
112 other than the chair, shall be compensated in an amount not to
Page 4

other than the chair, shall be compensated in an amount not to
HB141 Enrolled
113 exceed exceeding four hundred dollars ($400) per meeting
114 attended, not to exceed four thousand eight hundred dollars
115 ($4,800) per year.
116 (4) In all cities having populations municipalities
117 with a population of not less than 12,500 nor more than 13,500
118 according to the most recent federal decennial census, the
119 chair of the board of directors, at the discretion of the
120 board, may be paid a director's fee in an amount not exceeding
121 six hundred dollars ($600) per meeting attended, not to exceed
122 seven thousand two hundred dollars ($7,200) per year, and each
123 member of the board. Each director other than the chair may be
124 paid a director's fee in an amount not exceeding four hundred
125 dollars ($400) per meeting attended, not to exceed four
126 thousand eight hundred dollars ($4,800) per year.
127 (5) In all cities having populations municipalities
128 with a population of not less than 23,000 nor more than 27,000
129 according to the most recent federal decennial census, the
130 chair of the board of directors, at the discretion of the
131 board, may be paid a director's fee in an amount not exceeding
132 six hundred dollars ($600) per meeting attended, not to exceed
133 seven thousand two hundred dollars ($7,200) per year, and each
134 member of the board. Each director other than the chair may be
135 paid a director's fee in an amount not exceeding four hundred
136 dollars ($400) per meeting attended, but not to exceed four
137 thousand eight hundred dollars ($4,800) per year.
138 (6) In all cities municipalities located in Jefferson
139 County, Alabama, the chair of the board of directors, at the
140 discretion of the board, may be paid a director's fee in an
Page 5

discretion of the board, may be paid a director's fee in an
HB141 Enrolled
141 amount not exceeding four hundred fifty dollars ($450) each
142 month for one system and fifty dollars ($50) per month for
143 each additional system; and each member of the board. Each
144 director other than the chair may be paid a director's fee in
145 an amount not exceeding four hundred dollars ($400) each month
146 for one system and forty dollars ($40) per month for each
147 additional system.
148 (7) In all the cities municipalities in Franklin
149 County, including all Franklin County water or sewer board or
150 utility system or boards, or both, located therein, the
151 director's fee shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600)
152 each month for each system. The board in the cities
153 municipalities of Franklin County may also establish a chair's
154 fee in a higher amount by a vote of such the body not to
155 exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per meeting.
156 (8) All members of the board of directors of any
157 corporation organized pursuant to this article shall be
158 reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in and about the
159 performance of their duties pursuant to this article.
160 Notwithstanding the foregoing, in In a Class 7 municipality,
161 the chair of the board of directors of a corporation formed
162 under this chapter which owns and operates a water system, an
163 electric system, and a sewer system, at the discretion of the
164 governing body of the municipality with respect to which the
165 corporation was primarily organized, may be paid a director's
166 fee in an amount to be set and established by the governing
167 body. Each member of the board of directors, director other
168 than the chair, may be paid a director's fee in an amount to
Page 6

than the chair, may be paid a director's fee in an amount to
HB141 Enrolled
169 be set and established by the governing body.
170 (e) In addition to any other compensation authorized,
171 all members of the board of directors of any corporation
172 organized pursuant to this article shall be reimbursed for
173 actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties
174 pursuant to this article.
175 (f)(1)(c) Except as provided herein, any Any officer of
176 the a municipality shall be eligible for appointment with
177 respect to which a corporation was formed may be appointed and
178 may serve as a member of the board of directors of the
179 corporation for the term for which he or she is appointed or
180 during his or her tenure as a municipal officer, whichever
181 expires first, and may receive a fee for his or her services,
182 provided it the appointment is first approved by the board of
183 directors. At no time shall the board consist of more than two
184 officers of the municipality. The directors of the corporation
185 shall be elected by the governing body of the municipality,
186 and they shall be elected to hold office for staggered terms.
187 The first term of office of one director shall be two years,
188 of another director shall be four years, and of a third
189 director shall be six years, as shall be designated at the
190 time of their election, and thereafter the term of office of
191 each director shall be six years. The governing body of any
192 municipality which has heretofore or hereafter authorized the
193 creation of a corporation as provided in this article may
194 increase the board of directors from three to five members to
195 serve according to all the conditions and terms set forth in
196 this article. In the event the governing body elects to
Page 7

this article. In the event the governing body elects to
HB141 Enrolled
197 increase the board of directors from three to five members,
198 one member added to the board shall be appointed for a term of
199 four years and the remaining member for a term of six years,
200 and thereafter the term of each director shall be six years.
201 At no time shall the board
202 (2)a. Except as provided in paragraph b., a board may
203 not consist of more than two officers of the municipality with
204 respect to which the corporation was formed.
205 b. If the membership of a board has increased pursuant
206 to subsection (a), the board may not consist of more than
207 three officers of the municipality with respect to which the
208 corporation was formed. Any officer of the municipality
209 appointed to serve as a member of the board of directors shall
210 serve for the term for which he or she is appointed or during
211 his or her tenure as a municipal officer, whichever expires
212 first.
213 (3) Notwithstanding the foregoing any provision of this
214 subsection, the certificate of incorporation of a corporation
215 formed, or an amendment to the certificate heretofore or
216 hereafter adopted pursuant to this article may restrict or
217 prohibit service on the board of directors by officers of the
218 municipality with respect to which the corporation was formed.
219 (g)(d) Nothing in Act 2007-458 and nothing in
220 subsection (f) as amended by Act 2010-580 (a)(4) shall apply
221 to the City of Montgomery or the City of Prichard Water and
222 Sewer Board.
223 (h)(e) The amendatory provisions of this section as
224 provided in Act 2010-580 and the provisions of Act 2007-458
Page 8

provided in Act 2010-580 and the provisions of Act 2007-458
HB141 Enrolled
225 shall not affect the current board director and member fees in
226 the City of Birmingham.
227 (f) The governing body of any municipality which has a
228 population of less than 5,000 according to the most recent
229 federal census and which has heretofore or hereafter
230 authorized the creation of a corporation as provided in this
231 division may increase the board of directors from five to
232 seven members to serve according to all the conditions and
233 terms set forth in this division. In the event the governing
234 body elects to increase the board of directors from five to
235 seven members, one member added to the board shall be
236 appointed for a term of four years and the remaining member
237 for a term of six years, and thereafter the term of each
238 director shall be six years. At no time shall the board
239 consist of more than three officers of the municipality. Any
240 officer of the municipality appointed to serve as a member of
241 the board of directors shall serve for the term for which he
242 or she is appointed or during his or her tenure as a municipal
243 officer, whichever expires first."
244 Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 9

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB141 Enrolled
245
246
247
248
249
250
251
252
253
254
255
256
257 ________________________________________________
258 Speaker of the House of Representatives
259
260
261
262 ________________________________________________
263 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
264
265
266 House of Representatives
267
268 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
269 was passed by the House 26-Feb-26, as amended.
270
271 John Treadwell
272 Clerk
273
274
275
276
277
278 Senate 09-Apr-26 Passed
279
280
281
Page 10